Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.751

Biological samples for missing persons investigations.

Biological samples taken for a missing person's investigation under RCW 68.50.320 shall be forwarded to the appropriate laboratory as soon as possible. The crime laboratory of the Washington state patrol will provide guidance to agencies regarding where samples should be sent. If substantial delays in testing occur or federal testing is no longer available, the legislature should be requested to provide funding to implement mitochondrial technology in the state of Washington.

[ 2007 c 10 s 6; 2006 c 102 s 7.]

NOTES:

Intent—2007 c 10: See note following RCW 43.103.110.

Finding—Intent—2006 c 102: See note following RCW 36.28A.100.